Hawaii statutes.
[§11-324] Treasurer. (a) Every
candidate committee or noncandidate committee shall appoint a treasurer on or
before the day it files an organizational report. The following shall be
permissible:

(1) Up to five deputy treasurers may be appointed;

(2) A candidate may be appointed as the treasurer or
deputy treasurer; and

(3) An individual who is not an officer or treasurer
may be appointed by the candidate, on a fee or voluntary basis, to specifically
prepare and file reports with the commission.

(b) A treasurer may resign or be removed at
any time.

(c) In case of death, resignation, or removal
of the treasurer, the candidate, candidate committee, or noncandidate committee
shall promptly appoint a successor. During the period that the office of treasurer
is vacant, the candidate, candidate committee, or chairperson, or party
chairperson in the case of a party, whichever is applicable, shall serve as
treasurer.

(d) Only the treasurer and deputy treasurers
shall be authorized to receive contributions or to make or incur expenditures
on behalf of the candidate committee or noncandidate committee.

(e) The treasurer shall establish and maintain
itemized records showing:

(1) The amount of each monetary contribution;

(2) The description and value of each nonmonetary
contribution; and

(3) The name and address of each contributor making a
contribution of more than $25 in value; provided that information regarding the
employer and occupation of contributors shall also be collected and maintained
for a noncandidate committee.

(f) The treasurer shall maintain detailed
accounts, bills, receipts, and other records to establish that reports were
properly prepared and filed.

(g) The records shall be retained for at least
five years after the report is filed. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next